Hawaii statutes.
§560:7-303 Duty to inform and account to
beneficiaries. The trustee shall keep the beneficiaries of the trust
reasonably informed of the trust and its administration; provided, however,
during the life of the settlor, the trustee of a revocable inter vivos trust
shall not be required to register the trust, reveal the terms to beneficiaries,
or account to beneficiaries, unless otherwise directed by the settlor. In
addition:

(1) Within thirty days after the trustee's acceptance
of the trust, the trustee shall inform in writing the persons currently
entitled to benefits from the trust, and if possible, one or more persons who
under section 560:1-403 may represent beneficiaries with future interests, of
the court in which the trust is registered and of the trustee's name and
address.

(2) Upon reasonable request, the trustee shall
provide the beneficiary with a copy of the terms of the trust which describe or
affect the beneficiary's interest and with information about the assets of the
trust and the particulars relating to the administration.

(3) Upon reasonable request, a beneficiary is
entitled to a statement of the accounts of the trust annually and on
termination of the trust or change of the trustee. [L 1976, c 200, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 244, §13]

Rules of Court

Accountings, see Hawaii Probate Rules, part A(VII); trustee's
accounts, see HPR rule 126(d).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next